Utah statutes.
16-10a-1022.   Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for directors.
(1)  A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board
of directors than is required by this chapter may be amended or repealed:
(a)  if originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders,
unless otherwise permitted as contemplated by Subsection (2); or
(b)  if originally adopted by the board of directors, by the shareholders or
unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, by the
board of directors.
(2)  A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that fixes a greater
quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it
may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders
or the board of directors.
(3)  Action by the board of directors under Subsection (1)(b) to amend or
repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of
directors shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same
vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in
effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.
